Wisconsin, session 2025, AB120.
do enact as follows:AB120,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB120,2,23(1) Positions for the office of school safety. The authorized FTE 4positions for the department of justice are increased by 14.2 GPR positions on 1October 1, 2025, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (a), for the 2purpose of supporting and enhancing school safety initiatives.AB120,2,33